Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.121

Registered agent—Requirements.

A limited partnership or foreign limited partnership shall designate and continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6104; 2009 c 188 s 114.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.